Montana, session 2025, LC1633.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Right to digital identification card data deletion -- state government
databases -- implementation and compliance. (1) Montana residents must have the right to request the
deletion of their digital identification card data from government databases by submitting a written or electronic
request to the appropriate state agency.
(2) State government agencies shall comply with the deletion request within 30 days of receipt,
except under the following conditions:
(a) the data is required for an active legal investigation or proceeding; or
(b) the data is required to be retained in accordance with federal or state laws.
(3) Agencies shall provide a written explanation for a denial of a deletion request within 15 days of
the decision.
(4) Agencies managing digital identification card data shall establish a clear process for Montana
residents to submit deletion requests, including creating paper-based options and an accessible online
platform.
(5) Montana residents may file a complaint with the office of the attorney general if their deletion
request is unlawfully denied.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 2, and the provisions of Title 2 apply to [section 1].
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1633.1
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****